West Virginia, session 2025, SB386.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Occupational Therapy. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 4, 2024, authorized under the authority of §30-28-7 of this code, relating to the Board of Occupational Therapy (fees for services rendered by the Board, 13 CSR 03), is authorized.